src/fst/root-from-old-infra.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

! POS
+N +V +A 
+Adv +CC +CS +Interj +ProN +Num

! Verbal MSP
+Prs +Fut +Prt +Prf +PrfIpf +HstPrf +PluPrf +HstPluPrf
+Ind +Imp +Cond +Opt
! Subject indices
+Sc1Sg +Sc2Sg +Sc3Sg 
+Sc1Du +Sc2Du +Sc3Du 
+Sc1Pl +Sc2Pl +Sc3Pl 
! Object indices
+Oc1Sg +Oc2Sg +Oc3Sg 
+Oc1Du +Oc2Du +Oc3Du 
+Oc1Pl +Oc2Pl +Oc3Pl 
+Pass
+Act
+Inf
+Pos +Neg

! Nominal MSP
! Number
+Sg +Pl
! Case
+Nom +Acc +Gen +Abl +Dat +Loc +Pros +Tra +Abe +Adc +Ins +Apr +Ine +Ill +Ela +Egr
+Prl +Ter1 +Ter2 +Ter3 +Add1 +Add2
+Apr1 +Apr2
+EssInst
+Ord
+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
+Qst

+Appr
+Advc
+Ter
+Pro
+Car 

+Pers
+Dem

+PstI
+PstII

+Clt
!! Derivations
+Der/Ta
+Der/Te
+Der/ma
+Der/Tu
+Der/IA

%>
! Protoletters for xfst
V1 ! 0 ӑ
  ! These are for developing underlying morphology rules


! Key lexicon

LEXICON Root
A ; 	! ../../tmp
Abbreviation ;                          ! abbr-myv-lex.txt
!ABBR ;                                 ! ../../tmp/out/ABBR_myv-lex.xml           !2012-03-14
Acronym ;                               ! acro-myv-lex.txt
!ACRON ;                                ! ../../tmp/out/ACRON_myv-lex.xml          !2012-03-14
ADV ;
N ;
NUM ;
SPAT ;       ! ../../tmp/out/SPAT_myv-lex.xml
V ;
CONJUNCTION ;
SUBJUNCTION ;
INTERJECTION ;
NUMERAL ;
PronRoot ;
POSTPOSITION ;
PUNCTUATION ;



! I INCLUDE SOME SMALL LEXICA HERE
! WAITING FOR OWN FILES, OR PERHAPS THEY COULD STAY HERE

LEXICON CONJUNCTION 
но CT ;
нош CT ;

LEXICON CT
+CS: # ;
 
LEXICON SUBJUNCTION  
# ;

LEXICON INTERJECTION 
# ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
#;

LEXICON NUMBERSUF
+Num: K;
+Num:%> CASESUF ;
+Num:%> ORDINAL ;

LEXICON ORDINAL
+Ord:этӥ K;



LEXICON K
+Clt:%>ki # "also" ;
+Qst:а # ;
# ; 


LEXICON PUNCTUATION
#; 
LEXICON POSTPOSITION
#; 

LEXICON CADJ
+A: #; 
LEXICON DADJ
+A: #; 
LEXICON VADJ
+A: #;
 
LEXICON AdvTag
+Adv: # ; 

LEXICON MannerTag
+Adv+Manner: K ;

! SPATIAL
! Ordering anticipates overlap in 0Arg and 1Arg readings
LEXICON SpatTag
+Spat: K ;

LEXICON SpatLat-0Arg
+Spat+Lat+Adv: K ; 

LEXICON SpatLoc-0Arg
+Spat+Loc+Adv: K ;

LEXICON SpatAbl-0Arg
+Spat+Abl+Adv: K ;

LEXICON CASESUF
#; 
LEXICON PRON
#; 
LEXICON DEM
#; 
LEXICON PERS
#; 
